Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.464

Renewal notice.

"Renewal notice" means the notice to renew a vehicle registration sent to the registered owner by the department.

[ 2010 c 161 s 135.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.